North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 54. Juvenile Records and Social Reports. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-675 through 7A-683.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to juvenile records and social reports of delinquency and undisciplined cases under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-3000

et seq.